Utah statutes.
63M-2-203.   Research teams.

As funding becomes available from the Legislature or other sources, and subject to any restrictions or directions established by the Legislature, the governing authority shall allocate money to Utah State University and the University of Utah to provide funding for research teams to conduct science and technology research.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

